Mississippi, session 2026, HB4168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to John Neskoroscheny of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Strong-Armed Robbery in Pearl River County, on May 29, 2008, for which he was sentenced to serve ten (10) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released to Earned Release Supervision on March 6, 2012, and discharged on October 15, 2012.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.